Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-966
Sections, how construed.

The Legislature acknowledges the provisions of Article VII, sections 10, 13, and 14, of the Constitution of Nebraska. The provisions of sections 85-917 to 85-966.01 reflect the philosophy of the State of Nebraska and shall be acknowledged as such and implemented by the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska, the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges, the board of governors of each community college area, and the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 56;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 105;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 19;

Laws 1994, LB 683, § 10.